Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Workers’ Compensation
Board ........................................ $ 26,175,965
(2) Workers’ Compensation
Division..................................... $ 45,894,127
(3) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 45,164,307
(4) Central Services Division .......... $ 43,913,163
(5) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $149,972,928
(6) Building Codes Division ............ $ 40,062,331
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Department of  Consumer and Business Services from the Health Insur-
ance Exchange Fund established by ORS 741.102 for the following purposes:
(1) Marketplace Division ................ $ 14,510,661
(2) Central Services Division .......... $ 1,717,187
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,409,677 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses for the COFA Premium Assistance Program from the  COFA Premium
Assistance Program Fund established by ORS 735.617.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$1,200,000 for deposit in the  COFA Premium Assistance Program Fund established by ORS
735.617.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 12,551,325
(2) Senior Health Insurance
Benefit Assistance Program ..... $ 1,665,140
(3) Central Services Division .......... $ 322,357
(4) Building Codes Division ............ $ 255,595
(5) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $ 85,151,387
SECTION 6. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the following  expenditures by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Workers’ Benefit Fund;
(2) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Adjustment Reserve;
(3) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Group Adjustment Reserve;
(4) Expenditures from the  Consumer and Business Services Fund for payment of con-
tracted collection costs, including contracted processing costs for the Combined Payroll Tax
Reporting System and workers’ compensation paying agent reimbursements as  described in
ORS 656.307;
(5) Expenditures from the Funeral and Cemetery Consumer Protection Trust Fund; and
(6) Special payments to Oregon Health and Science University for  research on occupa-
tional illness and disease.
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  chapter 372, section 1 (4), Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Central Services Division, is reduced by $803,245.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by chapter 372, section 2 (2), Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Consumer and Business  Services from the Health Insurance Exchange Fund established by
ORS 741.102, for the Central Services Division, is increased by $803,245.
SECTION 9. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 3